Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.350

Foreign nationals or citizens, convicted offenders—Transfers and sentences.

Whenever any convicted offender, who is a citizen or national of a foreign country and is under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections, requests transfer to the foreign country of which he or she is a citizen or national, under a treaty on the transfer of offenders entered into between the United States and a foreign country, the governor or the governor's designee:

(1) May grant the approval of the state to such transfer as provided in the treaty; and

(2) Shall have, notwithstanding any provision of chapter 9.95 or 72.68 RCW, the plenary authority to fix the duration of the offender's sentence, if not otherwise fixed, whenever a fixed sentence is a condition precedent to transfer.

[ 1983 c 255 s 9.]